Arkansas, session 2025, HB1661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80 vested the judicial
power of the State of Arkansas in the judicial department;
(2) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94 vested the power to
determine the salaries of state officers, including district court judges,
with the independent citizens commission and the salaries are paid from the
Constitutional Officers Fund, Arkansas Code § 19-5-205;
(3) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94 and Arkansas Code § 19-
5-205 further established that district court judges are state-elected
officials under the Arkansas Constitution that render state judicial
*CEB067*
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
services;
(4) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, Arkansas Code § 16-17-
1104, Acts 2007, No. 663, Acts 2009, No. 345, and Acts 2011, No. 1219 further
directed that the state district court judges have their salaries set by the
independent citizens commission to be paid out of the Constitutional Officers
Fund, Arkansas Code § 19-5-205;
(5) In Cotham v. Coffman, 111 Ark. 108 (1914), the Supreme Court
established that state funds should be used for state purposes;
(6) In Honorable v. Hyde, 2024 Ark. 114, the Supreme Court
established that state funds should be used for state purposes; and
(7) Over the past quarter of a century the state has
transitioned from hundreds of part-time local municipal court, city court,
and district court judges to, commencing January 1, 2025, seventy (70) full-
time state district court judges resulting from a consolidation of these
courts into a unified state system of district courts.
(b) The General Assembly intends this act to:
(1) Eliminate the obligation of cities and counties to pay for
the salaries of state district court judges in Arkansas; and
(2) Provide for the efficient administration of justice.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-10-209(5)(F)(iii), concerning the
collection of installment payments, is repealed.
(iii) A municipal or county governing body that
adopted municipal or county legislation before July 1, 2012, to provide an
alternative method of installment payment allocation as then authorized by
state law shall remain in effect until repealed; and

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-10-307 is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is hereby created in each county a fund in the office of the
county treasurer to be known as the “county administration of justice fund”.
(b) The county administration of justice fund shall be used to defray
a part of the expenses of the administration of justice in the county. From
the county administration of justice fund, the county shall continue to
finance the following county agencies and programs and district court costs
which are currently funded, in whole or in part, by filing fees and court
costs, at a funding level equal to not less than the greater of the amount
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
which was collected by the county from filing fees and court costs for the
agency or program in the calendar year ending December 31, 1994, or the
amount appropriated by ordinance enacted prior to December 31, 1994, or on
February 13, 1995, or on February 14, 1995, or by resolution dated February
9, 1995, to the agency or program for the calendar year ending December 31,
1995:
(1) The prosecuting attorney fund, including all grant funds
awarded and appropriated for the calendar year ending December 31, 1995;
(2) The prosecuting attorney's victim-witness program fund;
(3) The public defender/indigent defense fund and public
defender investigator fund, including all grant funds awarded and
appropriated for the calendar year ending December 31, 1995;
(4) The county law library book fund;
(5) The county jail fund; and
(6) The intoxication detection equipment fund;
(7) Operating costs of the district court;
(8) Cost-sharing agreements related to the operation of the
district court; and
(9) Any other necessary costs associated with the administration
of justice in the county.
(c)(1)(A)(i) The For funds collected in circuit court matters, the
county administration of justice fund of each county may retain an amount
equal to the amount which was collected by the county from court costs and
filing fees for county administration of justice expense in the calendar year
ending December 31, 1994, or the amount appropriated from court costs and
filing fees by ordinance enacted prior to December 31, 1994, or on February
13, 1995, or on February 14, 1995, or by resolution dated February 9, 1995,
for county administration of justice expense from court costs and filing fees
for the calendar year ending December 31, 1995, plus, for calendar years 1995
— 2001, an additional amount based upon the average percentage increase in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as
published by the United States Department of Labor for the two (2) years
immediately preceding.
(ii) For funds collected in district court matters,
the county administration of justice fund may retain an amount equal to but
no more than fifty percent (50%) of uniform court costs and filing fees that
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
are collected.
(B)(i) The amount retained during calendar years 2002,
2003, 2004, and 2005 shall be the amount retained during calendar year 2001.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(iii) of this section, for calendar years beginning 2014 and each
calendar year thereafter, an additional amount shall be added to the amount
to be retained based upon the lesser of the average percentage increase in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as
published by the United States Department of Labor, for the two (2) years
immediately preceding or the percentage rate of increase in collections of
the State Administration of Justice Fund for the two (2) years immediately
preceding.
(iii) The provisions of subdivision (c)(1)(B)(ii) of
this section shall not be effective if the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
determines that the additional amount retained under subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(ii) of this section has exceeded one million dollars ($1,000,000)
in a calendar year and any additional amount to be retained must be
authorized by the General Assembly.
(C) All local ordinances of the counties and cities
authorized and adopted under § 24-8-318 shall remain in full force and
effect.
(2) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 1998, the base
amount to be retained shall be:
(A) Increased by any increase in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers as provided for in subdivision (c)(1) of this
section; and
(B) Decreased by eighty-five percent (85%) of the total
dollar amount which was certified by the county as having been collected
during calendar year 1994 and for the purpose of funding the office and
operation of the public defender and public defender investigator.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the county from funding any
additional costs for the administration of justice from these or other county
funds.
(e) The county shall remit on or before the fifteenth day of each
month all sums received in circuit court matters in excess of the amounts
necessary to fund the expenses enumerated in subsections (b) and (c) of this
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
section during the previous month from the uniform filing fees provided for
in §§ 21-6-403 and 9-15-202, and the uniform court costs provided for in §
16-10-305 to the Administration of Justice Funds Section for deposit into the
State Administration of Justice Fund.
(f) The county shall remit on or before the fifteenth day of each
month fifty percent (50%) of the moneys collected in district court matters
during the previous month from the uniform filing fees provided for in §16-
17-705 and the uniform court costs provided for in § 16-10-305 to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section for deposit into the State
Administration of Justice Fund.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-10-308 is amended to read as follows:
16-10-308. City administration of justice fund.
(a)(1) There is hereby created in each town or city which operates a
district court a fund in the office of the city treasurer to be known as the
“city administration of justice fund”.
(2)(A) A town or city operating a city court that becomes a
department of district court shall continue to maintain the city
administration of justice fund as originally established by this section.
(B) The city administration of justice fund of any town or
city shall cease to exist on and after the effective date of the ordinance
that abolishes the department of district court for that town or city
pursuant to state law.
(b) The city administration of justice fund shall be used to defray a
part of the expense of the administration of justice in the town or city.
From the city administration of justice fund, the town or city shall continue
to finance the following town or city agencies and programs and district
court costs which are currently funded, in whole or in part, by filing fees
and court costs, at a funding level equal to not less than the greater of the
amount which was collected by the town or city from court costs and filing
fees for the agency or program in the calendar year ending December 31, 1994,
or the amount appropriated by ordinance enacted prior to December 31, 1994,
to the agency or program for the calendar year ending December 31, 1995:
(1) The municipal court judge and clerk retirement fund for
disbursement as otherwise provided by law;
(2) The police and fire pension fund;
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(3) The intoxication detection equipment fund;
(4) All municipal-level programs and agencies funded in whole or
in part by court costs and filing fees assessed and collected by the district
court, notwithstanding the repeal by this act of laws authorizing the
collection of court costs and filing fees; and
(5) All county-level programs and agencies funded in whole or in
part by court costs and filing fees assessed and collected by the district
court, notwithstanding the repeal by this act of laws authorizing the
collection of court costs and filing fees and the disbursement of all or a
part thereof to the county;
(6) Operating costs of the district court;
(7) Cost-sharing agreements related to the operation of the
district court; and
(8) Any other necessary costs associated with the administration
of justice in the city or town.
(c)(1)(A) The city administration of justice fund of each town or city
may retain an amount equal to the amount which was collected by the town or
city from court costs and filing fees for city administration of justice
expense in the calendar year ending December 31, 1994, or the amount
appropriated from court costs and filing fees by ordinance enacted prior to
December 31, 1994, for city or county administration of justice expense from
court costs and filing fees for the calendar year ending December 31, 1995,
plus, for calendar years 1995-2001, an additional amount based upon the
average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers or its successor, as published by the United States Department of
Labor for the two (2) years immediately preceding but no more than fifty
percent (50%) of uniform court costs and filing fees that are collected.
(B)(i) The amount retained during calendar years 2002,
2003, 2004, and 2005 shall be the amount retained during calendar year 2001.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(iii) of this section, for calendar years beginning 2014 and each
calendar year thereafter, an additional amount shall be added to the amount
to be retained based upon the lesser of the average percentage increase in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as
published by the United States Department of Labor, for the two (2) years
immediately preceding or the percentage rate of increase in collections of
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
the State Administration of Justice Fund for the two (2) years immediately
preceding.
(iii) The provisions of subdivision (c)(1)(B)(ii) of
this section shall not be effective if the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
determines that the additional amount retained under subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(ii) of this section has exceeded one million dollars ($1,000,000)
in a calendar year, and any additional amount to be retained must be
authorized by the General Assembly.
(C) All local ordinances of the counties and cities
authorized and adopted under § 24-8-318 shall remain in full force and
effect.
(2) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 1998, the base
amount to be retained shall be:
(A) Increased by any increase in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers as provided for in subdivision (c)(1) of this
section; and
(B) Decreased by eighty-five percent (85%) of the total
dollar amount which was certified by the town or city as having been
collected during calendar year 1994 for the purpose of funding the office and
operation of the public defender and public defender investigator.
(d) Nothing in this act shall prevent the town or city from funding
any additional costs for the administration of justice from other town or
city funds.
(e) The town or city shall remit, on or before the fifteenth day of
each month, all sums received in excess of the amounts necessary to fund the
expenses enumerated in subsections (b) and (c) of this section fifty percent
(50%) of the moneys collected during the previous month from the uniform
filing fees provided for in §16-17-705 and the uniform court costs provided
for in § 16-10-305 to the Administration of Justice Funds Section for deposit
into the State Administration of Justice Fund.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 16-10-602 is amended to read as follows:
16-10-602. Establishment of city and county shares.
(a) Pursuant to §§§ 16-10-307(c) and 16-10-308(c), each town, city,
and a county may retain a portion of the uniform court costs and filing fees
collected and deposited into the city or county administration of justice
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
fund.
(b) On or before the first day of October of each year, the Department
of Finance and Administration shall certify in writing to each county and to
each town or city which operates a district court the amount of money which
may be retained during each month of the following calendar year by the town,
city, or county.
(c) Each town, city, or county which operates a district court, may
retain a portion of the uniform court costs and filing fees collected in
district court matters and deposited into the city administration of justice
fund or county administration of justice fund.
(d) The amount of money which may be retained from district court
matters shall be fifty percent (50%) of the uniform court costs and filing
fees collected during each month by the town, city, or county.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 16-10-603(b), concerning the procedure for
county administration of justice funds, is amended to read as follows:
(b) From the county administration of justice fund, the county
treasurer is to make, on a monthly basis, the following fund transfers or
disbursements:
(1)(A) Pursuant to § 16-10-307(c), the Department of Finance and
Administration will certify for each county the county's monthly share of
uniform court costs and filing fees to be retained by the county in circuit
court matters.
(B)(i) Each year the quorum court shall establish the
amount of uniform filing fees and court costs to be appropriated to each of
the county programs or agencies enumerated in § 16-10-307(b) from the
county's share of uniform court costs and filing fees.;
(ii) Each program or agency shall receive, as a
minimum, the amount established by § 16-10-307(b); and
(2) The excess of the monthly receipts of uniform filing fees
and court costs into the fund from subdivisions (a)(2)(A) and (B) of this
section, less the county's certified monthly share and the county treasurer's
commission, if any, as authorized by § 21-6-302, shall be remitted to the
Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to § 16-10-307(e); and
(3) Fifty percent (50%) of the monthly receipts of uniform
filing fees and court costs into the fund from subdivisions (a)(2)(C) and (D)
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
of this section, shall be remitted to the department pursuant to § 16-10-
307(e).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 16-10-604(b)—(d), concerning the procedure
for city administration of justice funds, is amended to read as follows:
(b) From the city administration of justice fund, the following fund
transfers or disbursements shall be made on a monthly basis:
(1)(A) Pursuant to § 16-10-308(c), the Department of Finance and
Administration will certify for each town or city the town's or city's
monthly share of uniform court costs and filing fees to be retained by the
town or city Each town's or city's share shall be an amount equal to fifty
percent (50%) of the uniform court costs and filing fees collected during
each month by the town or city.
(B)(i) Each year the town or city council shall establish
the amount of uniform filing fees and court costs to be appropriated to each
of the town or city programs or agencies enumerated in § 16-10-308(b) from
the town's or city's share of uniform court costs and filing fees.
(ii) Each program or agency shall receive, as a
minimum, the amount established by § 16-10-308(b).
(C) Each program or agency shall be paid, by warrant or
fund transfer, a monthly installment of at least one-twelfth (1/12) of the
annual appropriation provided for each by the town or city council;
(2)(A) Pursuant to § 16-10-308(b)(5), the town or city shall
remit to the county treasurer for deposit into the county administration of
justice fund a portion of the town's or city's share of uniform court costs
and filing fees.
(B) The amount of the remittance shall be based upon the
amount, if any, of uniform court costs and filing fees which had been
remitted by the town or city to common agreement of the town or city and the
county and shall be used by the county to fund county-level programs and
agencies during the base year defined in § 16-10-308(b).; and
(C) By common agreement, towns, cities, and counties may
establish a different fixed dollar amount or percentage of the town's or
city's monthly share of filing fees and court costs which shall be remitted
to the county treasurer;
(3) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 1998, the amount
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
of the remittance shall be based upon the amount, if any, of uniform court
costs and filing fees which had been remitted by the town or city to fund
county-level programs and agencies during the base year defined in § 16-10-
308(b), less eighty-five percent (85%) of the total dollar amount which was
certified by the town or city as having been collected during calendar year
1994 for the purpose of funding the office and operation of the public
defender and public defender investigator; and
(4) The excess of the monthly receipts into the fund, less the
town's or city's certified monthly share, Fifty percent (50%) of the uniform
court costs and filing fees collected during each month by the town or city
shall be remitted to the department Administration of Justice Fund Section in
the Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to under § 16-10-
308(e).
(c)(1) If a district court is operated solely by a county rather than
a town or city and all of the uniform court costs and filing fees collected
by the court are remitted to the county, the town or city shall not be
required to create a city administration of justice fund.
(2) The town's or city's share of uniform court costs and filing
fees shall be remitted directly to the county treasurer for deposit into the
county administration of justice fund.
(d)(1)(A) For any district court which was created after January 1,
1994, such that the base year used to calculate the town's or city's share
pursuant to § 16-10-308 was not complete, the town or city share shall be
deemed to be fifty percent (50%) of the uniform court costs and filing fees
collected and remitted to the city administration of justice fund.
(B) District courts created pursuant to § 16-17-901 et
seq. shall not be considered for purposes of this section to have been
created after January 1, 1994, or to have a base year that is not complete if
the district court is merely a continuation of a district or city court that
was in existence on December 31, 2007, or December 31, 2011 .
(C) From the fifty-percent share described in subdivision
(d)(1)(A) of this section, the town or city shall disburse or transfer fifty
percent (50%) of the funds to the local programs or agencies pursuant to
subdivision (b)(1) of this section and fifty percent (50%) to the county
treasurer pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(2) The remaining fifty percent (50%) shall be remitted to the
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to § 16-10-308(e).

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 16-13-704 is amended to read as follows:
16-13-704. Installment payments — Definition.
(a)(1) If the court concludes that the defendant has the ability to
pay the fine, but that requiring the defendant to make immediate payment in
full would cause a severe and undue hardship for the defendant and the
defendant's dependents, the court may authorize payment of the fine by means
of installment payments in accordance with this subchapter.
(2)(A) When a court authorizes payment of a fine by means of
installment payments, it shall issue, without a separate disclosure hearing,
an order that the fine be paid in full by a date certain and that in default
of payment, the defendant must appear in court to explain the failure to pay.
(B) In fixing the date of payment, the court shall issue
an order which will complete payment of the fine as promptly as possible
without creating a severe and undue hardship for the defendant and the
defendant's dependents.
(3) When a person is authorized to pay a fine on an installment
basis, any court cost assessed under § 9-15-202(d) or § 16-10-305(h) shall be
collected from the initial installment payment first.
(b)(1)(A) In addition to the fine and any other assessments authorized
by this subchapter, an installment fee of five dollars ($5.00) per month
shall be assessed on each person who is authorized to pay a fine on an
installment basis.
(B) This fee shall be collected in full each month in
which a defendant makes an installment payment.
(C) This fee shall accrue each month that a defendant does
not make an installment payment and the fine has not been paid in full.
(2)(A)(i) One-half (½) of the installment fee collected in
circuit court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative
Services of the Department of Finance and Administration, on a form provided
by that office the Office of Administrative Services, for deposit into the
Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.
(ii) The other half of the installment fee shall be
remitted by the tenth day of each month to the county treasurer to be
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
deposited into a fund entitled the “circuit court automation fund” to be used
solely for circuit court-related technology.
(B)(i) Expenditures from the circuit court automation fund
shall be approved by the administrative circuit judge of each judicial
circuit and shall be authorized and paid under the state laws governing the
appropriation and payment of county expenditures.
(ii) Expenditures may be made for indirect expenses
related to implementation of new court-related technology, including overtime
pay, personnel or travel expenses, and technology-related supplies.
(iii) Funds in each county in a judicial district may
be pooled for expenditure pursuant to a circuit-wide technology plan approved
by the administrative circuit judge.
(3)(A) One-half (½) of the installment fee collected in district
court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration
of Justice Funds Section, on a form provided by that section, for deposit
into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-
712.
(B) The other half of the installment fee collected in
district court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the city
treasurer of the city in which the district court is located to be deposited
into a fund entitled the “district court automation fund” to be used solely
for district court-related technology and court security-related
expenditures.
(C) In any district court which is funded solely by the
county, the other half of this fee shall be remitted by the tenth day of each
month to the county treasurer of the county in which the district court is
located to be deposited into the district court automation fund to be used
solely for district court-related technology and court security-related
expenditures.
(D)(i) Expenditures from the district court automation
fund shall be approved by a district judge and shall be authorized and paid
under state laws governing the appropriation and payment of county or
municipal expenditures by the governing body or, if applicable, governing
bodies, that contribute to the expenses of a district court.
(ii) Expenditures may be made for indirect expenses
related to implementation of new court-related technology, including overtime
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
pay, personnel or travel expenses, and technology-related supplies.
(iii)(a) Expenditures may be made for indirect
expenses related to the hiring and training of court security officers,
including travel expenses related to the training of court security officers.
(b) Expenditures do not include salary,
benefits, or overtime pay for court security officers.
(E)(i) In circuit court only, an installment fee of an
additional five dollars ($5.00) per month shall also be assessed on the first
day of each month on each person who is ordered to pay a fine on an
installment basis with the additional five dollars ($5.00) to be remitted to
the collecting official to be used to defray the cost of fine collection.
(ii) In district court only, an installment fee of
an additional five dollars ($5.00) per month shall also be assessed on the
first day of each month on each person who is ordered to pay a fine on an
installment basis with the additional five dollars ($5.00) to be remitted by
the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on
a form provided by that section for deposit into the State Administration of
Justice Fund.
(c)(1) For cases filed on or after January 1, 2026, in district court
only, the fee authorized in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be
five dollars ($5.00) and the fee authorized in subdivision (b)(3)(E)(ii)
of this section shall be two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50).
(2) The installment fees shall be assessed and collected until
the defendant has paid ninety dollars ($90.00) in installment fees or the
total assessment owed by the defendant has been paid, whichever occurs first.
(3) When the defendant has paid ninety dollars ($90.00) in
installment fees on his or her respective assessment, no more installment
fees shall be assessed or collected.
(4) If a defendant is ordered to pay a new fine, the ninety-
dollar installment fee cap shall not carry over or prevent a new assessment
of a monthly installment payment fee.
(5) If a defendant is making an installment payment in more than
one (1) department of a district court, the fees authorized in this
subsection shall be assessed and collected by each department.
(d) By September 1 of each year:
(1) The county treasurer shall submit electronically or in
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
writing a report disclosing the balance of the circuit court automation fund
to the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Finance and
Administration, the county judge of each county in the judicial circuit, and
each circuit judge of the judicial circuit;
(2) The city treasurer of the city in which a department of a
district court is located shall submit electronically or in writing a report
disclosing the balance of the district court automation fund to the
Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Finance and
Administration, the county judge of each county in the judicial district, the
mayor of each city contributing to the operating expenses of the department
of the district court, and each district judge of the judicial district; and
(3) The county treasurer shall submit electronically or in
writing a report disclosing the balance of the district court automation fund
to the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Finance and
Administration, the county judge of each county in the judicial district, the
mayor of each city contributing to the operating expenses of the department
of the district court, and each district judge of the judicial district.
(c)(e) Any defendant who has been authorized by the court to pay a
fine by installments shall be considered to have irrevocably appointed the
clerk of the court as his or her agent upon whom all papers affecting his or
her liability may be served, and the clerk shall forthwith notify the
defendant thereof by ordinary mail at his or her last known address.
(d)(f) “Ability to pay” means that the resources of the defendant,
including all available income and resources, are sufficient to pay the fine
and provide the defendant and his or her dependents with a reasonable
subsistence compatible with health and decency.
(g) Unless extended or repealed, the authority to assess and collect
the installment fee authorized in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section for
cases filed in district court and the installment fee authorized in
subdivision (b)(3)(E)(ii) of this section shall expire on December 31, 2031.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 16-17-121 is amended to read as follows:
16-17-121. Salary increases — Factors to consider.
(a) In the event the General Assembly establishes a district court
cost fund to be used exclusively for the operation and expenses of the
district court, any district court judge's, clerk's, or other employee's
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
salary authorized by § 16-17-108 may be increased from the minimum salary
upward to any amount not exceeding the maximum salary authorized in § 16-17-
108 and may be paid from the fund as set forth hereafter.
(b) The city council or the county quorum court, or both, if
authorized, of the local governmental jurisdictions responsible for paying
the salaries of the district court judge, clerks, and other employees may
authorize salary increases for the various court personnel as authorized
above after considering the following factors:
(1) The amount and availability of funds in the district court
cost fund;
(2) The volume of caseload;
(3) The backlog of cases, if any, on the court docket;
(4) The time required in dealing with cases; and
(5) The skill required in dealing with cases; and
(6) The amount of time taken away from the judge's private
practice, if applicable.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 17, Subchapter 9, is
repealed.
16-17-901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Department” means the physical location where sessions of
district court are held; and
(2) “Division” means the subject matter division of the district
court.

16-17-902. Counties having one district court.
(a) Each of the following counties shall have one (1) district court
and one (1) district judge:
(1) Howard;
(2) Montgomery;
(3) Perry;
(4) Polk;
(5) Randolph;
(6) Scott;
(7) Sevier; and
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(8) Stone.
(b) The district court shall be located in the county seat of each
county listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(c)(1) The judge of any district court located in a county with one
(1) district court shall be elected countywide.
(2) If there is only one (1) district court in a county, it
shall have countywide jurisdiction.

16-17-907. Clay County District Court.
(a)(1) Clay County shall have one (1) district court with three (3)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Corning;
(B) One (1) located in Piggott; and
(C) One (1) located in Rector.
(2) All three (3) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Clay County District Court Judge shall be elected countywide.
(c) The Clay County District Court shall have countywide jurisdiction.

16-17-914. Lonoke County District Courts.
(a) Lonoke County, having two (2) judicial districts, shall have the
following district courts and judges:
(1)(A) The Northern District of Lonoke County shall have one (1)
district court, with three (3) departments:
(i) One (1) located in Cabot;
(ii) One (1) located in Ward; and
(iii) One (1) located in Austin.
(B) All three (3) departments are to be served by one (1)
district judge; and
(2)(A) The Southern District of Lonoke County shall have one (1)
district court with five (5) departments as follows:
(i) One (1) located in Lonoke;
(ii) One (1) located in England;
(iii) One (1) located in Carlisle;
(iv) One (1) located in Allport; and
(v) One (1) located in Humnoke.
(B) All five (5) departments are to be served by one (1)
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
judge.
(b) The district court boundaries in Lonoke County shall be as
follows:
(1) The Northern District of Lonoke County shall consist of the
townships of Butler, Caroline, Cleveland, Eagle, Goodrum, Magness, Oak Grove,
Prairie, Totten, Ward, and York; and
(2) The Southern District of Lonoke County shall consist of the
townships of Carlisle, Crooked Creek, Dortch, Fletcher, Furlow, Gum Woods,
Gray, Hamilton, Indian Bayou, Isbell, Lafayette, Lonoke, Pettus, Richwoods,
Pulaski, Scott, Williams, and Walls.
(c) The judge of any district court in Lonoke County shall be elected
by the qualified electors of the judicial district in which the court is
located.
(d) The jurisdiction of each district court in Lonoke County shall be
limited to the judicial district in which the court is located.

16-17-916. Ouachita County District Courts.
(a) Ouachita County shall have the following district courts and
judges:
(1) Camden shall have:
(A) One (1) district court; and
(B) One (1) judge; and
(2)(A) East Camden shall have one (1) district court with four
(4) departments:
(i) One (1) located in Bearden;
(ii) One (1) located in Chidester;
(iii) One (1) located in East Camden; and
(iv) One (1) located in Stephens.
(B) All four (4) departments are to be served by one (1)
judge.
(b)(1) The judge of the Camden District Court shall be elected
countywide.
(2) The Camden District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.
(c)(1) The judge of the East Camden District Court shall be elected
countywide.
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(2) The East Camden District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-922. Yell County District Courts.
(a)(1) Yell County, having two (2) judicial districts, shall have two
(2) district courts with one (1) department located in the Northern District.
(2) The two (2) judicial districts shall each have one (1) part-
time judge serviced by the one (1) department in the Northern District.
(b) The judge of each district court in Yell County shall have
jurisdiction within each respective Northern and Southern District.
(c) The judge shall be elected within each respective district.

16-17-925. Sharp County District Court.
(a)(1) Sharp County shall have one (1) district court with two (2)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Ash Flat; and
(B) One (1) located in Cherokee Village.
(2) Both departments are to be served by (1) judge.
(b) The Sharp County District Court Judge shall be elected countywide.
(c) The Sharp County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-926. Woodruff County District Court.
(a)(1) Woodruff County shall have one (1) district court with four (4)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Augusta;
(B) One (1) located in Cotton Plant;
(C) One (1) located in McCrory; and
(D) One (1) located in Patterson.
(2) All four (4) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Woodruff County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Woodruff County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-928. Lawrence County District Court.
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(a)(1) Lawrence County shall have one (1) district court with four (4)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Walnut Ridge;
(B) One (1) located in Hoxie;
(C) One (1) located in Black Rock; and
(D) One (1) located in Portia.
(2) All four (4) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Lawrence County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Lawrence County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-933. Franklin County District Courts.
(a) Franklin County, having two (2) judicial districts, shall have the
following district courts and judges:
(1) The Charleston District shall have:
(A) One (1) district court located in Charleston; and
(B) One (1) district judge; and
(2)(A) The Ozark District shall have one (1) district court with
two (2) departments:
(i) One (1) located in Ozark; and
(ii) One (1) located in Altus.
(B) Both departments are to be served by one (1) district
judge.
(b) The judge of any district court located in Franklin County shall
be elected by the electors of the judicial district in which the court is
located.
(c) In Franklin County, the jurisdiction of the district court shall
be limited to the judicial district in which the court is located.

16-17-935. Logan County District Courts.
(a) Logan County, having two (2) judicial districts, shall have the
following district courts and judges:
(1) The Northern District shall have:
(A) One (1) district court located in Paris; and
(B) One (1) district judge; and
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(2)(A) The Southern District shall have one (1) district court
with two (2) departments:
(i) One (1) located in Booneville; and
(ii) One (1) located in Magazine.
(B) Both departments are to be served by one (1) district
judge.
(b) The judge of any district court located in Logan County shall be
elected by the electors of the judicial district in which the court is
located.
(c) In Logan County, the jurisdiction of the district court shall be
limited to the judicial district in which the court is located.

16-17-938. Columbia County District Court.
(a)(1) Columbia County shall have one (1) district court with two (2)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Magnolia; and
(B) One (1) located in Waldo.
(2) Both departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Columbia County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Columbia County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-939. Conway County District Court.
(a)(1) Conway County shall have one (1) district court with four (4)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Morrilton;
(B) One (1) located in Menifee;
(C) One (1) located in Oppelo; and
(D) One (1) located in Plumerville.
(2) All four (4) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Conway County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Conway County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
16-17-941. Cross County District Court.
(a)(1) Cross County shall have one (1) district court with three (3)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Wynne;
(B) One (1) located in Cherry Valley; and
(C) One (1) located in Parkin.
(2) All three (3) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Cross County District Court Judge shall be elected countywide.
(c) The Cross County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-944. Fulton County District Court.
(a)(1) Fulton County shall have one (1) district court with two (2)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Salem; and
(B) One (1) located in Mammoth Spring.
(2) Both departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Fulton County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Fulton County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-946. Izard County District Court.
(a)(1) Izard County shall have one (1) district court with two (2)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Melbourne; and
(B) One (1) located in Horseshoe Bend.
(2) Both departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Izard County District Court Judge shall be elected countywide.
(c) The Izard County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-947. Jackson County District Court.
(a)(1) Jackson County shall have one (1) district court with four (4)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Newport;
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(B) One (1) located in Diaz;
(C) One (1) located in Swifton; and
(D) One (1) located in Tuckerman.
(2) All four (4) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Jackson County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Jackson County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-948. Johnson County District Court.
(a)(1) Johnson County shall have one (1) district court with three (3)
departments:
(A) One (1) located in Clarksville;
(B) One (1) located in Lamar; and
(C) One (1) located in Coal Hill.
(2) All three (3) departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Johnson County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Johnson County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-951. Little River County District Court.
(a)(1) Little River County shall have one (1) district court with
three (3) departments:
(A) One (1) located in Ashdown;
(B) One (1) located in Foreman; and
(C) One (1) located in Winthrop.
(2) All departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Little River County District Court Judge shall be elected
countywide.
(c) The Little River County District Court shall have countywide
jurisdiction.

16-17-953. Pike County District Court.
(a)(1) Pike County shall have one (1) district court with two (2)
departments:
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
(A) One (1) located in Murfreesboro; and
(B) One (1) located in Glenwood.
(2) Both departments are to be served by one (1) judge.
(b) The Pike County District Court Judge shall be elected countywide.
(c) The Pike County District Court shall have countywide jurisdiction.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1104 is amended to read as follows:
16-17-1104. State district court judges — Salaries.
(a) The judges who are appointed or elected to serve the courts
created under this subchapter are state district court judges.
(b) The state shall pay the salary and benefits of a state district
court judge.
(c) The salaries of the state district court judges are uniform and
shall be paid with moneys appropriated from the Constitutional Officers Fund,
§ 19-5-205, by the General Assembly.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code §§ 16-17-1106 and 16-17-1107 are repealed.
16-17-1106. Salary of state district court judges — Cost-sharing.
(a) The state shall pay the salary and benefits of state district
court judges created under this subchapter.
(b)(1)(A) Each county and town or city in a district in which a state
district court judgeship is created under this subchapter shall pay to the
state an amount equal to its proportionate share of one-half (½) of the base
salary established by law for state fiscal year 2009 for that district's
state district court judge.
(B)(i) The proportionate share is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the sum total of the base salary
paid by each county and town or city in a district to that county and town or
city's district court judge or city court judge for the calendar year
immediately preceding the creation of the state district court judgeship; and
(b) Determine the proportion of the base
salary of each county and town or city to the sum total base salary of the
district.
(ii) Each county and town or city shall pay to the
state its proportionate share as determined in subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i)(a) of
this section of one-half (½) of the base salary established by law for state
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
fiscal year 2009 for each state district court judge in the district at the
time the county and town or city had a state district court judgeship
created.
(C) On a form provided by the Administration of Justice
Funds Section, each county and town or city in a district shall certify
annually on or before October 31 the amount to be paid to the state for its
share of one-half (½) of the salary as determined in this section for that
district's state district court judge.
(2)(A) This section does not prohibit a county and town or city
in a district in which a state district court judgeship is created under this
subchapter from agreeing in writing on the amount to be paid to the state by
the county and the town or city for its proportionate share of one-half (½)
of the salary as determined in this section for that district's state
district court judge.
(B) If a written agreement is reached under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section, the county and town or city shall submit on or
before October 31 a copy of that written agreement to the Administration of
Justice Funds Section.
(c) The amount of the state district court judge's salary initially
paid by the county and the town or city in a district and annually afterwards
shall be the amount determined under subsection (b) of this section.
(d)(1) Beginning with its annual meeting of 2011, the quorum court in
each county in a district in which a state district court judgeship is
created under this subchapter and the council in each town or city in a
district in which a state district court judgeship is created under this
subchapter shall appropriate annually from its general revenues an amount
sufficient to pay its share of the state district court judgeship salary
allocated to it under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The duty under subdivision (d)(1) of this section may be
enforced in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(e) On or before December 15, 2011, and annually afterwards, the
Administration of Justice Funds Section shall certify to the county and the
town or city in each district the amount of its share of one-half (½) of the
base salary established under subsection (b) of this section.
(f) On or before January 15, 2012, and annually afterwards, the county
and the town or city shall remit to the Administration of Justice Funds
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
Section for deposit into the Constitutional Officers Fund the sum necessary
to fund its share of the base salary allocated to it under subsection (e) of
this section.

16-17-1107. Salary of judges serving city or county.
This subchapter shall not in any way limit the power and authority of
local district courts currently existing. Except for the state district court
judgeships created under this subchapter, a judge serving in another full-
time or part-time local district court position shall continue to be an
employee of the cities or counties, or both, that he or she serves and shall
be paid according to state law.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 21-6-416(b) and (c), concerning the court
technology fee, are amended to read as follows:
(b) The court technology fee is as follows:
(1) For all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the
Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals............. $15.00
(2) For initiating a cause of action in the civil, domestic
relations, or probate division of circuit court, including
appeals............. 15.00
(3) For initiating a cause of action in the civil or small
claims division of district court............. 15.00
(4) For all criminal and traffic cases, from each defendant upon
each conviction, each plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or each bond
forfeiture............. 15.00.
(c)(1) The fee provided under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
collected in the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall be remitted by
the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before the fifteenth day of each month
to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by the
Office of Administrative Services for deposit into the Judicial Fine
Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.
(2) The fee provided under subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) (b)(2)—
(4) of this section collected in circuit court or district court shall be
remitted by the county or city official, agency, or department designated
under § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of fines
assessed in circuit court or district court on or before the fifteenth day of
03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067

HB1661
each month to the section, on a form provided by the office, for deposit into
the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.


































03/03/2025 3:06:51 PM CEB067